Wyoming statutes. Title 22 Elections
Article 4. Dissolution

§ 22-29-401.
Dissolution procedure.

Dissolution of a district may be initiated:

By a petition signed by not less than twenty-five percent (25%) of the voters owning not less than twenty-five percent (25%) of the assessed valuation of property within the district, requesting dissolution of the district, filed with the county commissioners. The petition process shall be governed by W.S.

22-29-105

through

22-29-108

;

By resolution of the district directors filed with the county commissioners when the district directors determine that it is in the best interest of the inhabitants of the district that the district be dissolved and liquidated;

By resolution of the county commissioners if:

Either:

The district at the time of the regular district election has not elected district directors as required by the principal act; or

The territory within the district is uninhabited; and

The county commissioners determine that it is in the best interest of the people of the county that the district be dissolved and liquidated.

Within five (5) business days after a petition is filed or a resolution of a county commission is adopted under this section, a copy shall be filed with the district secretary, if any, or with any other district officer who can with reasonable diligence be located;

If there are no qualified district director members, the county commissioners shall act as or appoint a board of trustees to act in behalf of the district.

Dissolution of a district shall be initiated by resolution of the board of county commissioners if the director of the department of audit has notified the board of county commissioners of the district’s failure to comply with the reporting requirements of W.S.

9-1-507

, and the district has failed to comply with W.S.

9-1-507

(a)(vii) by December 30 of that same calendar year. The board of county commissioners shall declare the board of directors vacant under W.S.

22-29-201

, and shall fill the board by appointment under W.S.

22-29-202

for the purpose of dissolving the district.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 99, § 1; 1998, ch. 115, § 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 26, § 1; 2015 ch. 77, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (a)(iv), substituted “five (5) business days” for “five (5) days.”

§ 22-29-402.
Findings of fact by district directors.

When dissolution proceedings have been initiated, the district directors shall make findings of fact which shall include:

The amount of each outstanding bond, coupon and other indebtedness, with a general description of the indebtedness and the name of the holder and owner of each, if known;

A description of each parcel of real property and interest in real property and, if the property was acquired for delinquent taxes or assessments, the amount of those taxes and assessments on each parcel of property;

Uncollected taxes, assessments and charges levied by the district and the amount upon each lot or tract of land;

A description of the personal property and of all other assets of the district;

The estimated cost of dissolution.

The district directors shall propose a plan of dissolution and liquidation.

Within thirty (30) days after initiation of the dissolution proceeding, the findings of fact and the proposed plan of dissolution and liquidation shall be filed in the office of the county clerk and shall be available for inspection by any interested person.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 99, § 1.

§ 22-29-403.
Plan for dissolution and liquidation.

The plan of dissolution and liquidation may include provisions for transfer and conveyance of all assets of the district to any other district or to the county or counties where the district is located which have the authority and agree to assume the outstanding indebtedness of the dissolving district, if any, and to continue to furnish similar services to the inhabitants of the district.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 99, § 1.

§ 22-29-404.
Election on dissolution; consent of creditors; content of notice.

Within ten (10) business days after the district directors file the plan of dissolution and liquidation required by W.S.

22-29-402

, the district directors shall call an election to be held not less than ninety (90) days nor more than one hundred twenty (120) days after the filing of the plan of dissolution or liquidation for the purpose of submitting to the voters of the district the question of whether the district shall be dissolved, its indebtedness liquidated and its assets disposed of in accordance with the plan proposed. No election shall be called until the consent of all known holders of valid indebtedness against the district is obtained or provision is made in the plan for payment of the nonconsenting holders. The notice of the election shall contain a brief summary of the plan of dissolution and liquidation and state that the plan of dissolution is available for examination at the office of the county clerk.

This election shall be conducted in accordance with W.S.

22-29-113

through

22-29-117

.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 99, § 1; 1998, ch. 115, § 2; 2015 ch. 77, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, near the beginning of (a), substituted “ten (10) business days” for “ten (10) days.”

§ 22-29-405.
Trustees for dissolved district; records to county clerk; limitation on further elections.

Upon canvassing the vote after the election, if it appears that a majority or more of the votes on the proposition approve dissolution, the district directors shall declare the district dissolved. The directors shall thereupon constitute a board of trustees under the supervision of county commissioners, who shall pay the debts or procure releases thereof and dispose of the property of the district. If the dissolved district was located wholly within the limits of one (1) county, the board of the dissolving district may designate the county commissioners as the board of trustees for the purpose of winding up the affairs of the district. If a majority of the votes cast on the proposition is against dissolution, the district directors shall declare the proposal defeated and cause the result of the vote to be made a part of the records of the district. In either case, the results of the election shall be certified to the county commissioners immediately after the canvass of the vote.

If dissolution is approved after the affairs of the district have been fully settled all books and records of the district shall be deposited by the board of trustees in the office of the county clerk of the county in which the greatest area of the district was located. At the same time, the board of trustees shall execute under oath and file with the county commissioners a statement that the district has been dissolved and its affairs liquidated. From the date of the statement, the corporate existence of the district is terminated for all purposes.

If a majority of the votes cast on the proposition are against dissolution, no further election for dissolution shall be called by the directors, upon petition or upon a resolution of the commissioners, prior to the expiration of one (1) year from the date of the election on dissolution.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 99, § 1; 1996, ch. 97, § 2; 1998, ch. 115, § 2.

§ 22-29-406.
Power of trustees to convey assets.

The board of trustees may convey to another district all assets of the dissolving district:

If the other district assumes all debts and obligations of the dissolving district and undertakes to continue to furnish the service provided by the dissolving district pursuant to the plan of dissolution and liquidation; and

If the written consent of all the known holders of valid indebtedness against the district has been obtained, or provision has been made in the plan for payment of the nonconsenting holders.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 99, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 22-29-407.
Disposition of assets.

Any surplus funds remaining to the credit of the district, after payment of the indebtedness of the district, shall be transferred to the county treasurer. If the assets of the district are insufficient to pay the indebtedness, the board of trustees shall levy taxes, within the limits of the authority of the district, for the liquidation of the indebtedness.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, if the property of a district is located within the corporate limits of a city, the property shall, upon dissolution of the district, vest in the city in which located and the property of the district lying outside the corporate limits of any city shall vest in the county until the formation of a city embracing the territory, at which time it shall vest in the city.

In each year that the county receives surplus funds to the credit of the district under subsection (a) of this section, any funds in the account of the district on June 30, in excess of six thousand dollars ($6,000.00) retained by the county for administration, shall be certified to the county assessor and shall be disposed of as provided under one (1) of the following procedures, as selected by the county assessor:

The funds may be offset against that portion of the levies of taxing units levied against the property values of property within the dissolved district. If the funds are offset as provided under this paragraph, the funds shall be distributed to each taxing unit in the amount of that taxing unit’s offset;

The amount may be credited to each property appearing on the tax roll for the year for which the credit applies within the dissolved district on the basis of current assessed value. If the surplus funds are distributed under this paragraph, the surplus funds shall be deposited in the unsegregated tax collections account established and distributed in the same manner as other funds in that account.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 99, § 1.

§ 22-29-408.
Dissolution without election.

The election required by W.S.

22-29-404

shall be dispensed with and the county commissioners shall declare the district dissolved if the county commissioners find that:

Dissolution is in the interest of the people of the county; and

At least one (1) of the following:

The territory within the affected district is uninhabited;

The district has failed regularly to elect district board members in accordance with the principal act of the district; or

That the district is not active and that there is no need for the district.

The election required by W.S.

22-29-404

shall be dispensed with and the board of county commissioners shall declare the district dissolved if the director of the department of audit has notified the board of county commissioners of the district’s failure to comply with the reporting requirements of W.S.

9-1-507

, and the district has failed to comply with W.S.

9-1-507

(a)(vii) by December 30 of that same calendar year.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 99, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 26, § 1; 2003, ch. 202, § 1.